Washington statutes.
RCW 35.69.010

Definitions.

The term "street" as used herein includes boulevard, avenue, street, alley, way, lane, square or place.

The term "city" includes any city of the first or second class or any other city of equal population working under a special charter.

The term "sidewalk" includes any and all pedestrian structures or forms of improvement for pedestrians included in the space between the street margin, as defined by a curb or the edge of the traveled road surface, and the line where the public right-of-way meets the abutting property.

[ 1996 c 19 s 2; 1994 c 81 s 61; 1965 c 7 s 35.69.010. Prior: 1927 c 203 s 1; RRS s 9332-1.]